California, session 20252026, SB474.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 38510 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:38510. The State Air Resources Board is the state agency charged with monitoring and regulating sources of emissions of greenhouse gases that cause global warming in order to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases.SEC. 2. Section 38511 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:38511. (a) (1) All authority of the State Air Resources Board under this division to adopt, revise, or repeal regulations is revoked.(2) Any section of law under this or any other division or code that grants authority to or requires the State Air Resources Board to adopt, revise, or repeal regulations, or requires the State Air Resources Board to take an action that would require the State Air Resources Board to exercise a regulatory authority, shall instead be read as only authorizing the State Air Resources Board to provide advice and propose measures to the Legislature for statutory enactment.(b) The State Air Resources Board shall, as necessary, provide advice and propose measures to the Legislature for statutory enactment regarding its duties pursuant to this division.(c) This section does not invalidate or repeal any regulation adopted by the State Air Resources Board before January 1, 2026.SEC. 3. Section 39600.5 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:39600.5. (a) (1) All authority of the State Air Resources Board under this division to adopt, revise, or repeal regulations is revoked.(2) Any section of law under this or any other division or code that grants authority to or requires the State Air Resources Board to adopt, revise, or repeal regulations, or requires the State Air Resources Board to take an action that would require the State Air Resources Board to exercise a regulatory authority, shall instead be read as only authorizing the State Air Resources Board to provide advice and propose measures to the Legislature for statutory enactment.(b) The State Air Resources Board shall, as necessary, provide advice and propose measures to the Legislature for statutory enactment regarding its duties pursuant to this division.(c) This section does not invalidate or repeal any regulation adopted by the State Air Resources Board before January 1, 2026.